Hawaii statutes.
§48E-9 Powers with respect to and security
for special purpose revenue bonds. In order to secure the payment of any
of the special purpose revenue bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, and
interest thereon, or in connection with such bonds, a county shall have the
power as to such bonds:

(1) To pledge all or any part of the receipts derived
by the county from the project agreement to the punctual payment of special
purpose revenue bonds issued for the pollution control project financed from
the proceeds thereof, and interest thereon, and to covenant against thereafter
pledging any such receipts to any other bonds or any other obligations of the
county for any other purpose, except as otherwise provided in the ordinance
providing for the issuance of additional special purpose revenue bonds to be
equally and ratably secured by a lien upon such revenues;

(2) To pledge and assign the project agreement and
other agreements related thereto rights, duties, and obligations of the county
thereunder, including the right to receive revenues thereunder;

(3) To covenant as to the use and disposition of the
proceeds from the sale of such bonds;

(4) To covenant to set aside or pay over reserves and
sinking funds for such bonds and as to the disposition thereof;

(5) To covenant and prescribe as to what happenings
or occurrences shall constitute "events of default" and the terms and
conditions upon which any or all of such bonds shall become or may be declared
due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such
declaration and its consequences may be waived;

(6) To covenant as to the rights, liabilities,
powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, conditions,
or obligation;

(7) If deemed necessary or advisable by the director
of finance, to designate a national or state bank or trust company within or
without the State to serve as trustee for the holders of the special purpose
revenue bonds and to enter into a trust indenture or trust agreement or
indenture of mortgage with such trustee. The trustee may be authorized to
receive and receipt for, hold, and administer the proceeds of the special
purpose revenue bonds issued for the pollution control project and to apply the
proceeds to the purposes for which such bonds are issued, or to receive and
receipt for, hold, and administer the revenues and other receipts derived by
the county under the project agreement and to apply such revenues and receipts
to the payment of the principal of, or interest on such special purpose revenue
bonds, or both. If a trustee is appointed, any trust indenture, trust
agreement, or indenture of mortgage entered into with the trustee may contain
any covenants and provisions as may be deemed necessary, convenient, or
desirable by the director in order to secure such bonds. The county may pledge
and assign to the trustee the project agreement and other agreements related
thereto and the rights of the county thereunder, including the rights to
revenues and receipts thereunder. If the director of finance appoints a
trustee for the holders of the special purpose revenue bonds, the director may
elect not to serve as fiscal agent for the payment of the principal and
interest, and for the purchase, registration, transfer, exchange, and
redemption, of the special purpose revenue bonds, or may elect to limit the
functions the director performs as such fiscal agent. The director may appoint
the trustee to serve as the fiscal agent, and may authorize and empower the
trustee to perform such functions with respect to such payment, purchase,
registration, transfer, exchange, and redemption, as the director deems
necessary, advisable, or expedient, including, without limitation, the holding
of the special purpose revenue bonds and coupons which have been paid and the supervision
and conduction or the destruction thereof in accordance with law;

(8) If a trustee is not appointed pursuant to
paragraph (7), to hold such proceeds or revenues and receipts, as the case may
be, in a separate account in the treasury of the county, to be applied solely
to the carrying out of the ordinance, trust indenture, trust agreement, or
indenture of mortgage, if any, authorizing or securing such special purpose
revenue bonds;

(9) To execute all instruments necessary or
convenient in the exercise of the powers granted by this chapter or in the
performance of its covenants and duties; and

(10) To make such covenants and do any and all such
acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to
secure such bonds, or in the discretion of the governing body of the county,
which tend to make such bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such
covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated in this chapter; it being the
purpose hereof to give each county the power to do all things in the issuance
of such bonds and for their security that may be consistent with the constitution
of the State of Hawaii. [L 1983, c 237, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next